Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1401
Legislative findings and intent.

The Legislature finds that accelerating the decommissioning of illegal water wells will be an asset to the State of Nebraska and good for the general welfare of the citizens of the state. The Legislature further finds that completing such decommissioning can be most appropriately accomplished by accelerating state financial input into the efforts currently being conducted. It is therefor the intent of the Legislature to embark upon an accelerated program for the decommissioning of Nebraska's illegal water wells and to recommend that the State of Nebraska and the Legislature annually appropriate ninety-nine thousand dollars from the General Fund to carry out this accelerated program during the years required for its completion.

Laws 1994, LB 981, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 237.